Wisconsin, session 2025, SB808.
do enact as follows:SB808,11Section 1. 20.395 (4) (be) of the statutes is created to read:SB808,2,4220.395 (4) (be) Blue envelope program. From the general fund, a sum 3sufficient to create and print envelopes and develop training materials for the blue 4envelope program under s. 343.179.SB808,25Section 2. 343.179 of the statutes is created to read:SB808,2,96343.179 Blue envelope program. (1) The department shall establish and 7administer a blue envelope program to promote inclusivity and enhanced 8communication between law enforcement officers and individuals with a condition 9or disability for which additional accommodations or awareness may be necessary.SB808,2,1210(2) The department shall develop and produce a blue envelope designed to 11hold a copy of the recipient’s vehicle registration and insurance card and any other 12useful documents. In addition, the blue envelope shall contain all of the following:SB808,2,1313(a) Printed information for the recipient regarding traffic stop safety.SB808,2,1614(b) Printed recommendations for responding law enforcement officers 15regarding interaction techniques to promote enhanced communication and 16accommodation between law enforcement officers and the recipient.SB808,3,11(c) A space for the recipient to provide emergency contact information.SB808,3,32(d) A space for the recipient or their emergency contact to add additional 3information pertaining to the recipient’s needs or requested accommodations.SB808,3,74(3) An individual may obtain a blue envelope produced under sub. (2) by 5declaring, on a form provided by the department, that they have an invisible 6disability. The department shall provide a blue envelope produced under sub. (2) to 7an individual that is any of the following:SB808,3,98(a) An individual who is protected by the federal Americans with Disabilities 9Act.SB808,3,1110(b) An individual who has a condition or disability for which additional 11accommodations or awareness may be necessary.SB808,3,1312(c) A parent or legal guardian, family member, conservator, or driver of an 13individual with a disability.SB808,3,1614(4) For each individual to whom the department issues a blue envelope 15produced under sub. (2), the department shall record the issuance in its file for the 16individual.SB808,3,1917(5) The department shall promulgate rules for the administration of the 18program under this section, including rules for the development of supplementary 19training materials for law enforcement.SB808,3,2020